District of Columbia statutes.
2-805

Extension of wires along parade routes.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, the Secretary of the Interior, and the Inaugural Committee may allow communications companies to extend overhead wires to places along a parade route that are considered convenient for use in connection with the parade and other inaugural purposes. The wires shall be removed not later than 10 days after the inaugural period ends.

Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1265, Pub. L. 105-225, § 505
1981 Ed., § 1-1055.